Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.904

Short title—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7.

Chapter 7, Laws of 2015 3rd sp. sess. may be known and cited as the early start act.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 22. Formerly RCW 43.215.909.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.216.085.